Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 4. Emergency Custody and Involuntary Temporary Detention.

§ 37.2-808.
Emergency custody; issuance and execution of order.

Any magistrate shall issue, upon the sworn petition of any responsible person, treating physician, or upon his own motion, or a court may issue pursuant to §

19.2-271.6

, an emergency custody order when he has probable cause to believe that any person (i) has a mental illness and that there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (a) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (b) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs, (ii) is in need of hospitalization or treatment, and (iii) is unwilling to volunteer or incapable of volunteering for hospitalization or treatment. Any emergency custody order entered pursuant to this section shall provide for the disclosure of medical records pursuant to §

37.2-804.2

. This subsection shall not preclude any other disclosures as required or permitted by law.

When considering whether there is probable cause to issue an emergency custody order, the magistrate may, in addition to the petition, or the court may pursuant to §

19.2-271.6

, consider (1) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (2) any past actions of the person, (3) any past mental health treatment of the person, (4) any relevant hearsay evidence, (5) any medical records available, (6) any affidavits submitted, if the witness is unavailable and it so states in the affidavit, and (7) any other information available that the magistrate or the court considers relevant to the determination of whether probable cause exists to issue an emergency custody order.

Any person for whom an emergency custody order is issued shall be taken into custody and transported to a convenient location to be evaluated to determine whether the person meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-809

and to assess the need for hospitalization or treatment. The evaluation shall be made by a person designated by the community services board who is skilled in the diagnosis and treatment of mental illness and who has completed a certification program approved by the Department.

The magistrate or court issuing an emergency custody order shall specify the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction to execute the emergency custody order and provide transportation. However, the magistrate or court shall consider any request to authorize transportation by an alternative transportation provider in accordance with this section, whenever an alternative transportation provider is identified to the magistrate or court, which may be a person, facility, or agency, including a family member or friend of the person who is the subject of the order, a representative of the community services board, or other transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner, upon determining, following consideration of information provided by the petitioner; the community services board or its designee; the local law-enforcement agency, if any; the person’s treating physician, if any; or other persons who are available and have knowledge of the person, and, when the magistrate or court deems appropriate, the proposed alternative transportation provider, either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system, that the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner.

When transportation is ordered to be provided by an alternative transportation provider, the magistrate or court shall order the specified primary law-enforcement agency to execute the order, to take the person into custody, and to transfer custody of the person to the alternative transportation provider identified in the order. In such cases, a copy of the emergency custody order shall accompany the person being transported pursuant to this section at all times and shall be delivered by the alternative transportation provider to the community services board or its designee responsible for conducting the evaluation. The community services board or its designee conducting the evaluation shall return a copy of the emergency custody order to the court designated by the magistrate or the court that issued the emergency custody order as soon as is practicable. Delivery of an order to a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider and return of an order to the court may be accomplished electronically or by facsimile.

Transportation under this section shall include transportation to a medical facility as may be necessary to obtain emergency medical evaluation or treatment that shall be conducted immediately in accordance with state and federal law. Transportation under this section shall include transportation to a medical facility for a medical evaluation if a physician at the hospital in which the person subject to the emergency custody order may be detained requires a medical evaluation prior to admission.

In specifying the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction for purposes of this section, the magistrate or court shall order the primary law-enforcement agency from the jurisdiction served by the community services board that designated the person to perform the evaluation required in subsection B to execute the order and, in cases in which transportation is ordered to be provided by the primary law-enforcement agency, provide transportation. If the community services board serves more than one jurisdiction, the magistrate or court shall designate the primary law-enforcement agency from the particular jurisdiction within the community services board’s service area where the person who is the subject of the emergency custody order was taken into custody or, if the person has not yet been taken into custody, the primary law-enforcement agency from the jurisdiction where the person is presently located to execute the order and provide transportation.

The law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider providing transportation pursuant to this section may transfer custody of the person to the facility or location to which the person is transported for the evaluation required in subsection B, G, or H if the facility or location (i) is licensed to provide the level of security necessary to protect both the person and others from harm, (ii) is actually capable of providing the level of security necessary to protect the person and others from harm, and (iii) in cases in which transportation is provided by a law-enforcement agency, has entered into an agreement or memorandum of understanding with the law-enforcement agency setting forth the terms and conditions under which it will accept a transfer of custody, provided, however, that the facility or location may not require the law-enforcement agency to pay any fees or costs for the transfer of custody.

A law-enforcement officer may lawfully go or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of executing an emergency custody order pursuant to this section.

A law-enforcement officer who, based upon his observation or the reliable reports of others, has probable cause to believe that a person meets the criteria for emergency custody as stated in this section may take that person into custody and transport that person to an appropriate location to assess the need for hospitalization or treatment without prior authorization. A law-enforcement officer who takes a person into custody pursuant to this subsection or subsection H may lawfully go or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of obtaining the assessment. Such evaluation shall be conducted immediately. The period of custody shall not exceed eight hours from the time the law-enforcement officer takes the person into custody.

A law-enforcement officer who is transporting a person who has voluntarily consented to be transported to a facility for the purpose of assessment or evaluation and who is beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves may take such person into custody and transport him to an appropriate location to assess the need for hospitalization or treatment without prior authorization when the law-enforcement officer determines (i) that the person has revoked consent to be transported to a facility for the purpose of assessment or evaluation, and (ii) based upon his observations, that probable cause exists to believe that the person meets the criteria for emergency custody as stated in this section. The period of custody shall not exceed eight hours from the time the law-enforcement officer takes the person into custody.

Nothing herein shall preclude a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider from obtaining emergency medical treatment or further medical evaluation at any time for a person in his custody as provided in this section.

A representative of the primary law-enforcement agency specified to execute an emergency custody order or a representative of the law-enforcement agency employing a law-enforcement officer who takes a person into custody pursuant to subsection G or H shall notify the community services board responsible for conducting the evaluation required in subsection B, G, or H as soon as practicable after execution of the emergency custody order or after the person has been taken into custody pursuant to subsection G or H.

The person shall remain in custody until (i) a temporary detention order is issued in accordance with §

37.2-809

, (ii) an order for temporary detention for observation, testing, or treatment is entered in accordance with §

37.2-1104

, ending law enforcement custody, (iii) the person is released, or (iv) the emergency custody order expires. An emergency custody order shall be valid for a period not to exceed eight hours from the time of execution.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the issuance of an order for temporary detention for testing, observation, or treatment pursuant to §

37.2-1104

for a person who is also the subject of an emergency custody order issued pursuant to this section. In any case in which an order for temporary detention for testing, observation, or treatment is issued for a person who is also the subject of an emergency custody order, the person may be detained by a hospital emergency room or other appropriate facility for testing, observation, and treatment for a period not to exceed 24 hours, unless extended by the court as part of an order pursuant to §

37.2-1101

, in accordance with subsection C of §

37.2-1104

. Upon completion of testing, observation, or treatment pursuant to § 37.2-1104, the hospital emergency room or other appropriate facility in which the person is detained shall notify the nearest community services board, and the designee of the community services board shall, as soon as is practicable and prior to the expiration of the order for temporary detention issued pursuant to § 37.2-1104, conduct an evaluation of the person to determine if he meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-809

.

Any person taken into emergency custody pursuant to this section shall be given a written summary of the emergency custody procedures and the statutory protections associated with those procedures.

If an emergency custody order is not executed within eight hours of its issuance, the order shall be void and shall be returned unexecuted to the office of the clerk of the issuing court or, if such office is not open, to any magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court.

In addition to the eight-hour period of emergency custody set forth in subsection G, H, or K, if the individual is detained in a state facility pursuant to subsection E of §

37.2-809

, the state facility and an employee or designee of the community services board as defined in §

37.2-809

may, for an additional four hours, continue to attempt to identify an alternative facility that is able and willing to provide temporary detention and appropriate care to the individual.

Payments shall be made pursuant to §

37.2-804

to licensed health care providers for medical screening and assessment services provided to persons with mental illnesses while in emergency custody.

No person who provides alternative transportation pursuant to this section shall be liable to the person being transported for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions that result from providing such alternative transportation.

For purposes of this section:

“Law-enforcement agency”
includes an auxiliary police force established pursuant to §

15.2-1731

.

“Law-enforcement officer”
includes an auxiliary police officer appointed or provided for pursuant to §§

15.2-1731

and

15.2-1733

, except for the purposes of subsection G.

History.

1995, c. 844, § 37.1-67.01; 1996, c. 893; 1998, c. 611; 2004, c. 737; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 7; 2008, cc. 202, 551, 691, 775, 779, 782, 784, 793, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 21, 112, 383, 455, 555, 607, 697, 838; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2011, c. 249; 2013, c. 371; 2014, cc. 691, 761; 2015, cc. 297, 308, 659; 2018, c. 570; 2020, cc. 1233, 1267; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 523, 540; 2022, c. 730.

Cross references.

As to this section’s applicability to minors, see § 16.1-340.

As to review of continuation of confinement hearings, procedures and reports for persons found not guilty by reason of insanity, see §

19.2-182.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2009, cc. 383 and
607, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

Acts
2014, c. 691, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act adding subsection M to
§ 16.1-340 and subsection N to
§

37.2-808

[now subsection O] of the Code of Virginia shall expire on June 30, 2018.”
Subsection O expired, however, Acts
2018, c. 570 enacted an identical subsection O.

Acts
2014, c. 691, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

Acts
2014, c. 691, cl. 5, and c. 761, cl. 2 provides: “That the Governor’s Task Force on Improving Mental Health Services and Crisis Response created on December 10, 2013, by Executive Order 68 shall identify and examine issues related to the use of law enforcement in the involuntary admission process. The task force shall consider options to reduce the amount of resources needed to detain individuals during the emergency custody order period, including the amount of time spent providing transportation throughout the admission process. Such options shall include developing crisis stabilization units in all regions of the Commonwealth and contracting for retired officers to provide needed transportation. The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by October 1, 2014.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1233 and
1267, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall convene a work group to include representatives from the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Sheriff’s Association, and the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia to develop standard policies and procedures regarding medical temporary detention orders. The work group shall complete its work no later than December 1, 2020.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 523 and
540, cl. 2 provides: “That the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall collect the following data and report such data annually to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice by December 1, 2021, and December 1, 2022: (i) the number of cases in which a defendant introduces evidence concerning his mental condition pursuant to
§

19.2-271.6

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act; (ii) the number of cases in which such evidence is introduced and a jury or court finds that a defendant did not have the intent required for the offense charged due to a mental illness as defined in
§

19.2-271.6

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, an intellectual or developmental disability, or autism spectrum disorder; (iii) the number of cases in which the court issues an emergency custody order pursuant to
§

37.2-808

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, after a jury or the court finds that a defendant did not have the intent required for the offense charged due to a mental illness as defined in
§ 19.2-271.6 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, an intellectual or developmental disability, or autism spectrum disorder; and (iv) if an emergency custody order is issued in such case, the number of defendants for whom no subsequent temporary detention order is issued and who are released, the number of defendants for whom a subsequent temporary detention order is issued, and the number of defendants who are subsequently involuntarily admitted.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 523 and
540, cl. 3 provides: “That the Joint Subcommittee to Study Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the Twenty-First Century (the Joint Subcommittee) shall study, consider, and provide recommendations regarding the relevant standard of danger to self or others that may be appropriately applied to persons found not guilty under this act in the issuance of emergency custody orders, involuntary temporary detention orders, or the ordering of other mandatory mental health treatments in accordance with Article 4 ( §

37.2-808

et seq.) or Article 5 ( §

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 37.2 of the Code of Virginia. The Joint Subcommittee shall report its findings, conclusions, and recommendations to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice by December 1, 2021.”

Acts
2022, c. 730, cl. 2 provides: “That, pursuant to subdivision 11 of
§

9.1-102

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Criminal Justice Services, when establishing compulsory minimum training standards for auxiliary police officers who are called into service solely for the purpose of providing transportation for such person subject to an emergency custody order pursuant to
§

37.2-808

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, or to provide transportation for a person in the temporary detention process pursuant to
§

37.2-810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be limited to establishing such compulsory minimum training standards to courses related to weapons, defensive tactics, de-escalation techniques, and working with individuals with disabilities, mental health needs, or substance use disorders.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 7 substituted “treatment that shall be conducted immediately in accordance with state and federal law” for “treatment. This evaluation or treatment shall be conducted immediately in accordance with state and federal law” in the second sentence and added the last sentence of subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 202 and 775 are identical, and inserted present subsection E, and redesignated former subsections E through I as subsections F through J.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical, and deleted “within his judicial district” preceding the clause (i) designation in subsection A; and substituted “magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court” for “magistrate thereof” at the end of subsection I [now J].

The 2008 amendment by c. 779, in subsection A, substituted clause (i) for former clauses (i) and (ii), which read: “(i) has mental illness, (ii) presents an imminent danger to himself or others as a result of mental illness or is so seriously mentally ill as to be substantially unable to care for himself” and redesignated the remaining clauses accordingly.

The 2008 amendment by c. 782 added the last two sentences in subsection A.

The 2008 amendment by c. 784, in subsection H [now subsection I], deleted “or” preceding “until the person is released” and substituted “or until the emergency custody order expires” for “but in no event shall the period of custody exceed four hours” in the first sentence; and added the second through the fifth sentences.

The 2008 amendment by c. 793 inserted the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “shall” for “may” and inserted “treating physician” in the introductory language of the first sentence and substituted clause (i) for former clauses (i) and (ii), which read: “(i) has mental illness, (ii) presents an imminent danger to himself or others as a result of mental illness or is so seriously mentally ill as to be substantially unable to care for himself,” redesignated former clauses (iii) and (iv) accordingly, and added the last two sentences; inserted the second paragraph in subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “to determine whether the person meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-809

and” in the first sentence; deleted “or behavioral health authority” following “community services board” in subsections B and D; in subsection H [now I], deleted “or” preceding “until the person is released” and substituted “or until the emergency custody order expires” for “but in no event shall the period of custody exceed four hours” in the first sentence and added the last four sentences; and added subsection J [now K].

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 21, effective February 23, 2009, and c. 838, effective April 8, 2009,
are identical and added the last three sentences in subsection G; and substituted “the magistrate shall extend the emergency custody order” for “an emergency custody order may be renewed” in the third sentence of subsection I (now J).

The 2009 amendments by cc. 112 and 697 are identical, and added the second through sixth sentences in the first paragraph of subsection C; in the first sentence of subsection D, substituted “In specifying the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction for purposes of this section, the” for “The” and inserted “in cases in which transportation is ordered to be provided by the primary law enforcement agency”; inserted “or alternative transportation provider” in subsections E and H; and inserted “in cases in which transportation is provided by a law-enforcement agency” at the beginning of clause (iii) in subsection E.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 383 and 607 are identical, and substituted “subsection B, G, or H” for “subsection B or G” in subsection E; inserted the next-to-last sentence in subsection G; added present subsection H and redesignated former subsections H through K as subsections I through L.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and inserted “except that an emergency custody order for a minor pursuant to § 16.1-340 shall only be issued if the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment set forth in § 16.1-345” at the end of clause (iii) in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and deleted “except that an emergency custody order for a minor pursuant to § 16.1-340 shall only be issued if the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment set forth in § 16.1-345” following “hospitalization or treatment” in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 249 substituted “six hours” for “four hours” in subsection K.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 371, in subsection C, inserted “but there is no substantial likelihood that the person will cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information,” substituted “shall consider any request to” for “may,” and inserted “in accordance with this section, whenever an alternative transportation provider is identified to the magistrate, which may be a person, facility, or agency” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 691 in subsections G, H, and K substituted “eight” for “four”; deleted the last two sentences in subsection G, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall issue an order extending the period of emergency custody one time for an additional period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (i) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the person can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

37.2-809

or (ii) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary”; deleted the last two sentences in subsection H, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall issue an order extending the period of emergency custody one time for an additional period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (a) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the person can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

37.2-809

, or (b) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary”; deleted the last three sentences in subsection K, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall extend the emergency custody order one time for a second period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (i) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the person can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

37.2-809

or (ii) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary. Any family member, as defined in §

37.2-100

, employee or designee of the local community services board as defined in § 37.2-809, treating physician, or law-enforcement officer may request the two-hour extension”; added subsections J, L, and N, and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection M substituted “eight” for “six.” As to the expiration of subsection N, see Editor’s note.

The 2014 amendment by c. 761 in subsections G, H, and K substituted “eight” for “four”; in subsection G deleted the last two sentences, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall issue an order extending the period of emergency custody one time for an additional period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (i) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the person can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

37.2-809

or (ii) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary”; in subsection H deleted the last two sentences, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall issue an order extending the period of emergency custody one time for an additional period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (a) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the person can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

37.2-809

, or (b) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary”; in subsection K deleted the last three sentences, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall extend the emergency custody order one time for a second period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (i) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the person can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

37.2-809

or (ii) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary. Any family member, as defined in §

37.2-100

, employee or designee of the local community services board as defined in § 37.2-809, treating physician, or law-enforcement officer may request the two-hour extension”; added subsections J and L and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection M substituted “eight” for “six.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 297 and 308 are identical, and in the second sentence in subsection C, deleted “in cases in which the emergency custody order is based upon a finding that the person who is the subject of the order has a mental illness and that there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs but there is no substantial likelihood that the person will cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information,” following “However” and added subsection P. Subsection P was subsequently redesignated as subsection Q at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendment by c. 659 added subsection L and redesignated former subsections L through O as subsections M through P.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 570 added subsection O.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by cc. 1233 and 1267 are identical, and in subsection K, inserted clause (i) designator preceding “a temporary detention order,” inserted “in accordance with §

37.2-809

” following “issued,” deleted “until” following “§

37.2-809

,” added clause (ii) designator, clause (iii), and clause (iv) designator.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 523 and 540, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or a court may issue pursuant to §

19.2-271.6

” in the first paragraph and “or the court may pursuant to §

19.2-271.6

” in the second paragraph; in subsections C and N, inserted “or court” following “magistrate” throughout; and inserted “or the court that issued the emergency custody order” in the next-to-last sentence in subsection C.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 730, added subsection R.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-1908 Emergency Custody Order; No. 9-2002 Petition for Involuntary Admission for Treatment.